en: Crossover type: Active (requires external DSP/amp); Band-pass (BPF); External passive crossover box; Full crossover (HPF + LPF); High-pass (HPF); In-line (tweeter harness); Low-pass (LPF); None; Selectable/multi-mode crossover; Subsonic (infrasonic) filter; Other
sk-SK: Typ prejazdu: Aktívny (vyžaduje externý DSP/zosilňovač); Pásmový priepust (BPF); Externý pasívny crossover box; Plný crossover (HPF + LPF); Horný priepust (HPF); In-line (zväzok výškového reproduktora); Dolný priepust (LPF); Žiadne; Voliteľný/viacmódový crossover; Subsonický (infrasonický) filter; Iné
es: Tipo de cruce: Activo (requiere DSP/amplificador externo); Pasa banda (BPF); Caja de crossover pasivo externo; Crossover completo (HPF + LPF); Pasa alta (HPF); En línea (arnés de tweeter); Pasa baja (LPF); Ninguno; Crossover seleccionable/multimodo; Filtro subsónico (infrasónico); Otro
th: ประเภทครอสโอเวอร์: แอกทีฟ (ต้องใช้ DSP/แอมป์ภายนอก); Band-pass (BPF); กล่องครอสโอเวอร์แพสซีฟภายนอก; ครอสโอเวอร์เต็มรูปแบบ (HPF + LPF); High-pass (HPF); อินไลน์ (ชุดสายไฟทวีตเตอร์); Low-pass (LPF); ไม่มี; ครอสโอเวอร์แบบเลือกได้/หลายโหมด; ตัวกรองความถี่ต่ำมาก (อินฟราโซนิก); อื่นๆ
vi: Loại giao nhau: Chủ động (yêu cầu bộ khuếch đại/DSP bên ngoài); Thông dải (BPF); Hộp phân tần thụ động bên ngoài; Phân tần đầy đủ (HPF + LPF); Thông cao (HPF); Đấu dây nối tiếp (bộ dây loa treble); Thông thấp (LPF); Không có; Phân tần có thể chọn/đa chế độ; Bộ lọc hạ âm (hạ thanh); Khác
el: Τύπος διασταύρωσης: Ενεργό (απαιτεί εξωτερικό DSP/ενισχυτή); Ζωνοπερατό (BPF); Εξωτερικό κουτί παθητικού crossover; Πλήρες crossover (HPF + LPF); Υψιπερατό (HPF); Εν σειρά (πλεξούδα tweeter); Βαθυπερατό (LPF); Κανένα; Επιλέξιμο/Crossover πολλαπλών λειτουργιών; Υποηχητικό φίλτρο (Subsonic); Άλλο
sv: Delningsfiltertyp: Aktivt (kräver extern DSP/förstärkare); Bandpass (BPF); Extern passiv delningsfilterbox; Fullt delningsfilter (HPF + LPF); Högpass (HPF); In-line (diskantkablage); Lågpass (LPF); Inget; Valbart/flerläges delningsfilter; Subsoniskt (infrasoniskt) filter; Övrigt
ko: 크로스오버 유형: 액티브(외부 DSP/앰프 필요); 밴드 패스(BPF); 외부 패시브 크로스오버 박스; 풀 크로스오버(HPF 및 LPF); 하이 패스(HPF); 인라인(트위터 하네스); 로우 패스(LPF); 없음; 선택형/멀티 모드 크로스오버; 서브소닉(인프라소닉) 필터; 기타
sl-SI: Vrsta kretnice: Aktivni (zahteva zunanji DSP/ojačevalnik); Pasovno prepustni (BPF); Zunanja pasivna kretnica; Polna kretnica (HPF in LPF); Visokoprepustni (HPF); Vgrajeni (kabelski snop za visokotonec); Nizkoprepustni (LPF); Brez; Izbirna/večnačinska kretnica; Podzvočni (infrazvočni) filter; Drugo
ja: クロスオーバータイプ: アクティブ (外部DSP / アンプが必要); バンドパス (BPF); 外部パッシブクロスオーバーボックス; フルクロスオーバー (HPF + LPF); ハイパス (HPF); インライン (ツイーターハーネス); ローパス (LPF); なし; 選択可能 / マルチモードクロスオーバー; サブソニック (インフラソニック) フィルター; その他
hr-HR: Vrsta križanja: Aktivni (zahtijeva vanjski DSP/pojačalo); Pojasnopropusni (BPF); Vanjska pasivna skretnica (kutija); Puna skretnica (HPF i LPF); Visokopropusni (HPF); Redni (kabel za visokotonac); Niskopropusni (LPF); Bez skretnice; Skretnica s više načina rada / odabirom; Subsonični (infrasonični) filtar; Ostalo
cs: Typ výhybky: Aktivní (vyžaduje externí DSP/zesilovač); Pásmová propust (BPF); Externí pasivní výhybka; Plná výhybka (HPF a LPF); Horní propust (HPF); In-line (kabeláž pro výškový reproduktor); Dolní propust (LPF); Žádná; Volitelná/víceúčelová výhybka; Subsonický (infrasonický) filtr; Ostatní
ro-RO: Tip crossover: Activ (necesită DSP/amplificator extern); Trece-bandă (BPF); Cutie crossover pasiv extern; Crossover complet (HPF + LPF); Trece-sus (HPF); În linie (cablaj tweeter); Trece-jos (LPF); Niciunul; Crossover selectabil/multi-mod; Filtru subsonic (infrasonic); Altele
fi: Jakosuodintyyppi: Aktiivinen (vaatii ulkoisen DSP:n/vahvistimen); Kaistanpäästö (BPF); Ulkoinen passiivinen jakosuodinkotelo; Täysi jakosuodin (HPF ja LPF); Ylipäästö (HPF); In-line (diskanttijohtosarja); Alipäästö (LPF); Ei mitään; Valittava/monitilajakosuodin; Subsonic-suodatin (infraääni); Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de crossover: Ativo (requer DSP/amplificador externo); Passa-banda (BPF); Caixa de crossover passivo externa; Crossover completo (HPF + LPF); Passa-alta (HPF); In-line (chicote de tweeter); Passa-baixa (LPF); Nenhum; Crossover selecionável/multimodo; Filtro subsônico (infrassônico); Outro
da: Crossover-type: Aktiv (kræver ekstern DSP/forstærker); Båndpas (BPF); Ekstern passiv delefilterboks; Fuld crossover (HPF og LPF); Højpas (HPF); In-line (diskant-ledningsnet); Lavpas (LPF); Ingen; Valgbar/multi-mode crossover; Subsonisk (infrasonisk) filter; Andet
fr: Type de filtre répartiteur: Actif (nécessite un DSP/amplificateur externe); Passe-bande (BPF); Boîtier de filtre passif externe; Filtre complet (HPF + LPF); Passe-haut (HPF); En ligne (faisceau de tweeter); Passe-bas (LPF); Aucun; Filtre sélectionnable/multimode; Filtre subsonique (infrasonique); Autre
lt-LT: Krosoverio tipas: Aktyvus (reikalingas išorinis DSP / stiprintuvas); Pralaidumo juostos (BPF); Išorinė pasyviojo krosoverio dėžutė; Pilnas krosoveris (HPF + LPF); Aukštųjų dažnių (HPF); Nuoseklusis (aukštų dažnių garsiakalbio laidai); Žemųjų dažnių (LPF); Nėra; Pasirenkamas / kelių režimų krosoveris; Žemųjų dažnių (infragarsinis) filtras; Kita
pt-PT: Tipo rede de cruzamento: Ativo (requer DSP/amplificador externo); Passa-banda (BPF); Caixa de crossover passivo externa; Crossover completo (HPF + LPF); Passa-alto (HPF); Em linha (cablagem de tweeter); Passa-baixo (LPF); Nenhum; Crossover selecionável/multimodo; Filtro subsónico (infrassónico); Outro
bg-BG: Тип кросоувър: Активен (изисква външен DSP/усилвател); Лентов (BPF); Външна пасивна кросоувър кутия; Пълен кросоувър (HPF + LPF); Високочестотен (HPF); Вграден (окабеляване за високочестотен говорител); Нискочестотен (LPF); Без; Избираем/многорежимен кросоувър; Субсоничен (инфразвуков) филтър; Други
zh-TW: 分音器類型: 主動式 (需要外部 DSP/放大器); 帶通 (BPF); 外部被動分音盒; 全分音 (HPF + LPF); 高通 (HPF); 直列式 (高音喇叭線束); 低通 (LPF); 無; 可選/多模式分音器; 亞音速 (次聲) 濾波器; 其他
pl: Typ zwrotnicy: Aktywna (wymaga zewnętrznego procesora DSP/wzmacniacza); Środkowoprzepustowa (BPF); Zewnętrzna zwrotnica pasywna (obudowa); Pełna zwrotnica (HPF i LPF); Górnoprzepustowa (HPF); Przewodowa (wiązka głośnika wysokotonowego); Dolnoprzepustowa (LPF); Brak; Zwrotnica z wyborem / wielotrybowa; Filtr subsoniczny (infrasoniczny); Inna
de: Art der Frequenzweiche: Aktiv (erfordert externen DSP/Verstärker); Bandpass (BPF); Externe passive Frequenzweiche; Vollständige Frequenzweiche (HPF + LPF); Hochpass (HPF); In-Line (Hochtöner-Kabelbaum); Tiefpass (LPF); Keine; Wählbare/Multi-Mode-Frequenzweiche; Subsonic-Filter (Infraschall); Sonstige
nb: Delefiltertype: Aktiv (krever ekstern DSP/forsterker); Båndpass (BPF); Ekstern passiv delefilterboks; Fullt delefilter (HPF + LPF); Høypass (HPF); In-line (diskantkabel); Lavpass (LPF); Ingen; Valgbart / multi-modus delefilter; Subsonisk (infrasonisk) filter; Annet
it: Tipo crossover: Attivo (richiede DSP/amplificatore esterno); Passa-banda (BPF); Box crossover passivo esterno; Crossover completo (HPF + LPF); Passa-alto (HPF); In linea (cablaggio tweeter); Passa-basso (LPF); Nessuno; Crossover selezionabile/multimodale; Filtro subsonico (infrasonico); Altro
ru: Тип кроссовера: Активный (требует внешний DSP/усилитель); Полосовой (BPF); Внешний пассивный кроссовер (блок); Полный кроссовер (ФВЧ + ФНЧ); Фильтр высоких частот (HPF); Линейный (кабель для твитера); Фильтр низких частот (LPF); Нет; Переключаемый/многорежимный кроссовер; Сабсоник (инфразвуковой фильтр); Другое
hu: Crossover típusa: Aktív (külső DSP/erősítő szükséges); Sáváteresztő (BPF); Külső passzív hangváltó doboz; Teljes hangváltó (HPF és LPF); Felüláteresztő (HPF); Beépített (magassugárzó-kábel); Aluláteresztő (LPF); Nincs; Választható/többmódú hangváltó; Szubszonikus (infraszonikus) szűrő; Egyéb
zh-CN: 分频器类型: 有源（需要外部 DSP/放大器）; 带通 (BPF); 外部无源分频器盒; 全分频 (HPF + LPF); 高通 (HPF); 串联（高音扬声器线束）; 低通 (LPF); 无; 可选/多模式分频器; 次声波（亚声波）滤波器; 其他
tr: Crossover tipi: Aktif (harici DSP/amfi gerektirir); Bant geçiren (BPF); Harici pasif crossover kutusu; Tam crossover (HPF + LPF); Yüksek geçiren (HPF); Hat içi (tweeter kablo tesisatı); Alçak geçiren (LPF); Yok; Seçilebilir/çok modlu crossover; Ses altı (infrasonik) filtre; Diğer
nl: Crossover type: Actief (vereist externe DSP/versterker); Banddoorlaat (BPF); Externe passieve crossover-box; Volledige crossover (HPF + LPF); Hoogdoorlaat (HPF); In-line (tweeterharnas); Laagdoorlaat (LPF); Geen; Selecteerbare/multi-mode crossover; Subsonisch (infrasonisch) filter; Overig